Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 2 Inspection Warrants for Residential Child Care Licensing

49-2-20.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Inspection warrant” means a warrant authorizing a search or inspection of private property where such a search or inspection is one that is necessary for the enforcement of a residential child care licensing law.

“Residential child care licensing law” means this chapter and Chapter 5 of this title and any rule or regulation duly promulgated thereunder.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-2-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, “this article” was substituted for “this part” in the introductory language of this Code section.

49-2-21.
Persons who may obtain inspection warrants; authorization of searches or inspections of property.

The commissioner or the commissioner’s designee, in addition to other procedures now or hereafter provided, may obtain an inspection warrant under the conditions specified in this article. Such warrant shall authorize the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee to conduct a search or inspection of property either with or without the consent of the person whose property is to be searched or inspected if such search or inspection is one that is elsewhere authorized under the rules and regulations duly promulgated pursuant to a residential child care licensing law.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-2-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, “this article” was substituted for “this part” at the end of the first sentence in this Code section.

49-2-22.
Procedure for issuance of inspection warrants.

Inspection warrants shall be issued only by a judge of a court of record whose territorial jurisdiction encompasses the property to be inspected.

The issuing judge shall issue the warrant when the judge is satisfied that the following conditions are met:

The one seeking the warrant must establish under oath or affirmation that the property to be inspected is to be inspected as a part of a legally authorized program of inspection which includes that property or that there is probable cause for believing that there is a condition, object, activity, or circumstance which legally justifies such an inspection of that property; and

The issuing judge determines that the issuance of the warrant is authorized by this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-2-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, “this article” was substituted for “this part” at the end of paragraph (b)(2).

49-2-23.
Requirements for validly issued inspection warrant; contents of warrant.

The inspection warrant shall be validly issued only if it meets the following requirements:

The warrant is attached to the affidavit required to be made in order to obtain the warrant;

The warrant describes either directly or by reference to the affidavit the property upon which the inspection is to occur and is sufficiently accurate that the executor of the warrant and the owner or possessor of the property can reasonably determine from it the property of which the warrant authorizes an inspection;

The warrant indicates the conditions, objects, activities, or circumstances which the inspection is intended to check or reveal; and

The warrant refers in general terms to the statutory or regulatory provisions sought to be enforced.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-2-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

49-2-24.
Evidence generated inadmissible in criminal proceedings.

No facts discovered or evidence obtained in an inspection conducted under authority of an inspection warrant issued pursuant to this article shall be competent as evidence in any criminal proceeding against any party.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-2-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, “this article” was substituted for “this part” in this Code section.

49-2-25.
Proceedings for injunction for purpose of enjoining violations of provisions of residential child care licensing law; injunction to abate public nuisance injurious to public health, safety, or comfort.

The Department of Human Services is empowered to institute appropriate proceedings for injunction in the courts of competent jurisdiction in this state for the purpose of enjoining a violation of any provision of a residential child care licensing law as now existing or as may be hereafter amended or of any regulation or order duly issued by the board or department. The department is also empowered to maintain action for injunction to abate any public nuisance which is injurious to the public health, safety, or comfort. Such actions may be maintained notwithstanding the fact that such violation also constitutes a crime and notwithstanding that other adequate remedies at law exist. Such actions may be instituted in the name of the department in the county in which a violation of any provision of this title occurs.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-2-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.